Florida, session 2026, SB206.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 37 38 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 39 1004.85, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsection (9) is 40 added to that section, to read: 41 1004.85âPostsecondary educator preparation institutes.â 42 (3)âEducator preparation institutes approved pursuant to 43 this section may offer competency-based certification programs 44 specifically designed for noneducation major baccalaureate 45 degree holders to enable program participants to meet the 46 educator certification requirements of s. 1012.56. An educator 47 preparation institute choosing to offer a competency-based 48 certification program pursuant to the provisions of this section 49 must implement a program developed by the institute and approved 50 by the department for this purpose. Approved programs shall be 51 available for use by other approved educator preparation 52 institutes. 53 (b)âEach program participant must: 54 1.âMeet certification requirements pursuant to s. 55 1012.56(1) by obtaining a statement of status of eligibility in 56 the certification subject area of the educational plan and meet 57 the requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f) before participating in 58 field experiences. 59 2.âDemonstrate competency and participate in field 60 experiences that are appropriate to his or her educational plan 61 prepared under paragraph (a). Beginning with candidates entering 62 an educator preparation institute in the 2022-2023 school year, 63 a candidate for certification in a coverage area identified 64 pursuant to s. 1012.585(3)(f) must successfully complete all 65 competencies for a reading endorsement, including completion of 66 the endorsement practicum through the candidateâs field 67 experience, in order to graduate from the program. 68 3.âBefore completion of the program, fully demonstrate his 69 or her ability to teach the subject area for which he or she is 70 seeking certification by documenting a positive impact on 71 student learning growth in a prekindergarten through grade 12 72 setting and, except as provided in s. 1012.56(7)(a)3., achieving 73 a passing score on the professional education competency 74 examination, the basic skills examination, and the subject area 75 examination for the subject area certification which is required 76 by state board rule. 77 4.âFor each participant who is certified in exceptional 78 student education, complete the autism micro-credential created 79 pursuant to s. 1004.551(1)(f). 80 (9)âBy August 1, 2027, as a condition for continued program 81 approval, each educator preparation institute must offer 82 instruction and training on evidence-based practices for 83 teaching students with autism spectrum disorder, Down syndrome, 84 other developmental disabilities, and emotional or behavioral 85 disabilities, consistent with the uniform core curricula 86 developed by the department. 87 Section 2.âSection 1009.636, Florida Statutes, is created 88 to read: 89 1009.636âAutism educator loan forgiveness program.â 90 (1)âThe Legislature finds that an adequate supply of 91 special education teachers is critical to provide students who 92 have a neurodevelopmental disability, such as autism spectrum 93 disorder, with individualized education to foster essential 94 social-emotional skills, provide positive interventions, and 95 build life skills for independence. The Autism Educator Loan 96 Forgiveness Program is created to recruit and retain qualified 97 individuals to serve as special education teachers for students 98 with autism spectrum disorder. 99 (2)âTo be eligible, an individual must: 100 (a)1.âHave earned a masterâs or higher degree in special 101 education or exceptional student education from an accredited 102 institution and have an active student loan balance from 103 completion of that degree, and hold a temporary or professional 104 certificate; or 105 2.âHave earned a bachelorâs or higher degree from an 106 accredited institution and have an active student loan balance 107 from completion of that degree, hold a temporary or professional 108 certificate, and hold the Autism Spectrum Disorder Endorsement 109 or Severe or Profound Disabilities Endorsement; and 110 (b)âServe as the primary teacher in a public school 111 classroom in which a majority of the students have autism 112 spectrum disorder. 113 (3)âEligible participants may receive up to $17,500 in 114 total student loan repayment assistance over 5 years, disbursed 115 in annual payments not to exceed $3,500 per year. Payments must 116 be made directly to the lender servicing the participantâs 117 student loan. 118 (4)âIn order for the department to release each annual 119 payment, a teacher must: 120 (a)âHave completed a full year of service pursuant to 121 paragraph (2)(b). 122 (b)âHave received a rating of effective or highly effective 123 pursuant to s. 1012.34. 124 (c)âNot have had any disciplinary action taken by the 125 school district or by the department against the teacherâs 126 certificate. 127 (5)âThe State Board of Education shall adopt rules to 128 administer this section. 129 Section 3.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) and paragraph 130 (a) of subsection (3) of section 1012.22, Florida Statutes, are 131 amended to read: 132 1012.22âPublic school personnel; powers and duties of the 133 district school board.âThe district school board shall: 134 (1)âDesignate positions to be filled, prescribe 135 qualifications for those positions, and provide for the 136 appointment, compensation, promotion, suspension, and dismissal 137 of employees as follows, subject to the requirements of this 138 chapter: 139 (c)âCompensation and salary schedules.â 140 1.âDefinitions.âAs used in this paragraph: 141 a.ââAdjustmentâ means an addition to the base salary 142 schedule that is not a bonus and becomes part of the employeeâs 143 permanent base salary and shall be considered compensation under 144 s. 121.021(22). 145 b.ââGrandfathered salary scheduleâ means the salary 146 schedule or schedules adopted by a district school board before 147 July 1, 2014, pursuant to subparagraph 4. 148 c.ââInstructional personnelâ means instructional personnel 149 as defined in s. 1012.01(2)(a)-(d), excluding substitute 150 teachers. 151 d.ââPerformance salary scheduleâ means the salary schedule 152 or schedules adopted by a district school board pursuant to 153 subparagraph 5. 154 e.ââSalary scheduleâ means the schedule or schedules used 155 to provide the base salary for district school board personnel. 156 f.ââSchool administratorâ means a school administrator as 157 defined in s. 1012.01(3)(c). 158 g.ââSupplementâ means an annual addition to the base salary 159 for the term of the negotiated supplement as long as the 160 employee continues his or her employment for the purpose of the 161 supplement. A supplement does not become part of the employeeâs 162 continuing base salary but shall be considered compensation 163 under s. 121.021(22). 164 2.âCost-of-living adjustment.âA district school board may 165 provide a cost-of-living salary adjustment if the adjustment: 166 a.âDoes not discriminate among comparable classes of 167 employees based upon the salary schedule under which they are 168 compensated. 169 b.âDoes not exceed 50 percent of the annual adjustment 170 provided to instructional personnel rated as effective. 171 3.âAdvanced degrees.âA district school board may use 172 advanced degrees in setting a salary schedule for instructional 173 personnel or school administrators if the advanced degree is 174 held in the individualâs area of certification. 175 4.âGrandfathered salary schedule.â 176 a.âThe district school board shall adopt a salary schedule 177 or salary schedules to be used as the basis for paying all 178 school employees hired before July 1, 2014. Instructional 179 personnel on annual contract as of July 1, 2014, shall be placed 180 on the performance salary schedule adopted under subparagraph 5. 181 Instructional personnel on continuing contract or professional 182 service contract may opt into the performance salary schedule if 183 the employee relinquishes such contract and agrees to be 184 employed on an annual contract under s. 1012.335. Such an 185 employee shall be placed on the performance salary schedule and 186 may not return to continuing contract or professional service 187 contract status. Any employee who opts into the performance 188 salary schedule may not return to the grandfathered salary 189 schedule. 190 b.âIn determining the grandfathered salary schedule for 191 instructional personnel, a district school board must base a 192 portion of each employeeâs compensation upon performance 193 demonstrated under s. 1012.34 and shall provide differentiated 194 pay for both instructional personnel and school administrators 195 based upon district-determined factors, including, but not 196 limited to, additional responsibilities, school demographics, 197 high-demand teacher needs areas, and level of job performance 198 difficulties. 199 5.âPerformance salary schedule.âBy July 1, 2014, the 200 district school board shall adopt a performance salary schedule 201 that provides annual salary adjustments for instructional 202 personnel and school administrators based upon performance 203 determined under s. 1012.34. Employees hired on or after July 1, 204 2014, or employees who choose to move from the grandfathered 205 salary schedule to the performance salary schedule shall be 206 compensated pursuant to the performance salary schedule once 207 they have received the appropriate performance evaluation for 208 this purpose. 209 a.âBase salary.âThe base salary shall be established as 210 follows: 211 (I)âThe base salary for instructional personnel or school 212 administrators who opt into the performance salary schedule 213 shall be the salary paid in the prior year, including 214 adjustments only. 215 (II)âInstructional personnel or school administrators new 216 to the district, returning to the district after a break in 217 service without an authorized leave of absence, or appointed for 218 the first time to a position in the district in the capacity of 219 instructional personnel or school administrator shall be placed 220 on the performance salary schedule. 221 b.âSalary adjustments.âSalary adjustments for highly 222 effective or effective performance shall be established as 223 follows: 224 (I)âThe annual salary adjustment under the performance 225 salary schedule for an employee rated as highly effective must 226 be at least 25 percent greater than the highest annual salary 227 adjustment available to an employee of the same classification 228 through any other salary schedule adopted by the district. 229 (II)âThe annual salary adjustment under the performance 230 salary schedule for an employee rated as effective must be equal 231 to at least 50 percent and no more than 75 percent of the annual 232 adjustment provided for a highly effective employee of the same 233 classification. 234 (III)âA salary schedule shall not provide an annual salary 235 adjustment for an employee who receives a rating other than 236 highly effective or effective for the year. 237 c.âSalary supplements.âIn addition to the salary 238 adjustments, each district school board shall provide for salary 239 supplements for activities that must include, but are not 240 limited to: 241 (I)âAssignment to a Title I eligible school. 242 (II)âAssignment to a school that earned a grade of âFâ or 243 three consecutive grades of âDâ pursuant to s. 1008.34 such that 244 the supplement remains in force for at least 1 year following 245 improved performance in that school. 246 (III)âCertification and teaching in high-demand teacher 247 needs areas. Statewide high-demand teacher needs areas shall be 248 identified by the State Board of Education under s. 1012.07. 249 However, the district school board may identify other areas of 250 high-demand needs within the school district for purposes of 251 this sub-sub-subparagraph and may remove areas identified by the 252 state board which do not apply within the school district. 253 (IV)âAssignment of additional academic responsibilities. 254 (V)âCompletion of the Autism Spectrum Disorder Endorsement. 255 256 If budget constraints in any given year limit a district school 257 boardâs ability to fully fund all adopted salary schedules, the 258 performance salary schedule shall not be reduced on the basis of 259 total cost or the value of individual awards in a manner that is 260 proportionally greater than reductions to any other salary 261 schedules adopted by the district. Any compensation for 262 longevity of service awarded to instructional personnel who are 263 on any other salary schedule must be included in calculating the 264 salary adjustments required by sub-subparagraph b. 265 (3)(a)âCollective bargaining.âNotwithstanding provisions of 266 chapter 447 related to district school board collective 267 bargaining, collective bargaining may not preclude a district 268 school board from carrying out its constitutional and statutory 269 duties related to the following: 270 1.âProviding incentives to effective and highly effective 271 teachers. 272 2.âImplementing intervention and support strategies under 273 s. 1008.33 to address the causes of low student performance and 274 improve student academic performance and attendance. 275 3.âImplementing student discipline provisions required by 276 law, including a review of a studentâs abilities, past 277 performance, behavior, and needs. 278 4.âImplementing school safety plans and requirements. 279 5.âImplementing staff and student recognition programs. 280 6.âDistributing correspondence to parents, teachers, and 281 community members related to the daily operation of schools and 282 the district. 283 7.âProviding any required notice or copies of information 284 related to the district school board or district operations 285 which is readily available on the school districtâs website. 286 8.âThe school districtâs calendar. 287 9.âProviding incentives to exceptional student education 288 teachers who complete the Autism Spectrum Disorder Endorsement, 289 in addition to any stipend funded in the General Appropriations 290 Act for completion of the endorsement, and who serve as the 291 primary teacher in a classroom in which a majority of the 292 students have autism spectrum disorder. 293 Section 4.âParagraph (g) of subsection (2) of section 294 1012.551, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsection (4) is 295 added to that section to read: 296 1012.551âTeacher preparation core principles, standards, 297 and content.â 298 (2)âThe uniform core curricula for each state-approved 299 teacher preparation program must meet, at a minimum, the 300 following standards: 301 (g)âMust include strategies for differentiated instruction 302 to meet student needs, including English language learners and 303 students with disabilities, while maintaining grade-level 304 expectations. The strategies must also include specific training 305 aligned with evidence-based practices for supporting students 306 with autism spectrum disorder, Down syndrome, other 307 developmental disabilities, and emotional or behavioral 308 disabilities applicable across all levels of support. 309 (4)âEach state-approved teacher preparation program using 310 the uniform core curricula developed pursuant to this section 311 must include the autism micro-credential created pursuant to s. 312 1004.551(1)(f), which shall count for at least 1 semester hour 313 toward completion of the program. 314 Section 5.âParagraph (g) is added to subsection (2) of 315 section 1012.552, Florida Statutes, to read: 316 1012.552âThe Coaching for Educator Readiness and Teaching 317 (CERT) Certification Program.â 318 (2)âPROGRAM REQUIREMENTS.âA CERT program must include all 319 of the following: 320 (g)âRequired successful completion of the autism micro 321 credential created pursuant to s. 1004.551(1)(f) for a candidate 322 certification in exceptional student education. 323 Section 6.âParagraph (e) of subsection (3) of section 324 1012.585, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 325 1012.585âProcess for renewal of professional certificates.â 326 (3)âFor the renewal of a professional certificate, the 327 following requirements must be met: 328 (e)âBeginning July 1, 2014, an applicant for renewal of a 329 professional certificate must earn a minimum of one college 330 credit or the equivalent inservice points in the area of 331 instruction for teaching students with disabilities. The 332 requirement in this paragraph may not add to the total hours 333 required by the department for continuing education or inservice 334 training. Beginning August 1, 2027: 335 1.âInstruction for teaching students with disabilities must 336 include autism spectrum disorder, Down syndrome, other 337 developmental disabilities, and emotional or behavioral 338 disabilities. 339 2.âAn applicant certified in exceptional student education 340 must earn the autism micro-credential created pursuant to s. 341 1004.551(1)(f), which must count toward 3 college credits or the 342 equivalent inservice points. Once earned, an applicant is not 343 required to earn the micro-credential for additional renewal 344 periods. 345 Section 7.âSubsection (3) is added to section 1012.586, 346 Florida Statutes, to read: 347 1012.586âAdditions or changes to certificates; duplicate 348 certificates; reading endorsement pathways.â 349 (3)âPersonnel certified in exceptional student education 350 who complete the Autism Spectrum Disorder Endorsement are 351 eligible for a stipend as specified in the General 352 Appropriations Act. 353 Section 8.âParagraph (b) of subsection (5) of section 354 1012.98, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 355 1012.98âSchool Community Professional Learning Act.â 356 (5)âThe Department of Education, school districts, schools, 357 Florida College System institutions, and state universities 358 share the responsibilities described in this section. These 359 responsibilities include the following: 360 (b)âEach school district shall develop a professional 361 learning system as specified in subsection (4). The system shall 362 be developed in consultation with teachers, teacher-educators of 363 Florida College System institutions and state universities, 364 business and community representatives, and local education 365 foundations, consortia, and professional organizations. The 366 professional learning system must: 367 1.âBe reviewed and approved by the department for 368 compliance with s. 1003.42(3) and this section. Effective March 369 1, 2024, the department shall establish a calendar for the 370 review and approval of all professional learning systems. A 371 professional learning system must be reviewed and approved every 372 5 years. Any substantial revisions to the system must be 373 submitted to the department for review and approval. The 374 department shall establish a format for the review and approval 375 of a professional learning system. 376 2.âBe based on analyses of student achievement data and 377 instructional strategies and methods that support rigorous, 378 relevant, and challenging curricula for all students. Schools 379 and districts, in developing and refining the professional 380 learning system, shall also review and monitor school discipline 381 data; school environment surveys; assessments of parental 382 satisfaction; performance appraisal data of teachers, managers, 383 and administrative personnel; and other performance indicators 384 to identify school and student needs that can be met by improved 385 professional performance. 386 3.âProvide inservice activities coupled with follow-up 387 followup support appropriate to accomplish district-level and 388 school-level improvement goals and standards. The inservice 389 activities for instructional and school administrative personnel 390 shall focus on analysis of student achievement data; ongoing 391 formal and informal assessments of student achievement; 392 identification and use of enhanced and differentiated 393 instructional strategies that emphasize rigor, relevance, and 394 reading in the content areas; enhancement of subject content 395 expertise; integrated use of classroom technology that enhances 396 teaching and learning; classroom management; parent involvement; 397 and school safety. 398 4.âProvide inservice activities and support targeted to the 399 individual needs of new teachers participating in the 400 professional learning certification and education competency 401 program under s. 1012.56(8)(a). 402 5.âInclude a professional learning catalog for inservice 403 activities, pursuant to rules of the State Board of Education, 404 for all district employees from all fund sources. The catalog 405 must be updated annually by September 1, must be based on input 406 from teachers and district and school instructional leaders, and 407 must use the latest available student achievement data and 408 research to enhance rigor and relevance in the classroom. Each 409 district inservice catalog must be aligned to and support the 410 school-based inservice catalog and school improvement plans 411 pursuant to s. 1001.42(18). Each district inservice catalog must 412 provide a description of the training that middle grades 413 instructional personnel and school administrators receive on the 414 districtâs code of student conduct adopted pursuant to s. 415 1006.07; integrated digital instruction and competency-based 416 instruction and CAPE Digital Tool certificates and CAPE industry 417 certifications; classroom management; student behavior and 418 interaction; extended learning opportunities for students; and 419 instructional leadership. District plans must be approved by the 420 district school board annually in order to ensure compliance 421 with subsection (1) and to allow for dissemination of research 422 based best practices to other districts. District school boards 423 shall submit verification of their approval to the Commissioner 424 of Education no later than October 1, annually. Each school 425 principal may establish and maintain an individual professional 426 learning plan for each instructional employee assigned to the 427 school as a seamless component to the school improvement plans 428 developed pursuant to s. 1001.42(18). An individual professional 429 learning plan must be related to specific performance data for 430 the students to whom the teacher is assigned, define the 431 inservice objectives and specific measurable improvements 432 expected in student performance as a result of the inservice 433 activity, and include an evaluation component that determines 434 the effectiveness of the professional learning plan. 435 6.âInclude inservice activities for school administrative 436 personnel, aligned to the stateâs educational leadership 437 standards, which address updated skills necessary for 438 instructional leadership and effective school management 439 pursuant to s. 1012.986. 440 7.âProvide for systematic consultation with regional and 441 state personnel designated to provide technical assistance and 442 evaluation of local professional learning programs. 443 8.âProvide for delivery of professional learning by 444 distance learning and other technology-based delivery systems to 445 reach more educators at lower costs. 446 9.âProvide for the continuous evaluation of the quality and 447 effectiveness of professional learning programs in order to 448 eliminate ineffective programs and strategies and to expand 449 effective ones. Evaluations must consider the impact of such 450 activities on the performance of participating educators and 451 their studentsâ achievement and behavior. 452 10.âFor all grades, emphasize: 453 a.âInterdisciplinary planning, collaboration, and 454 instruction. 455 b.âAlignment of curriculum and instructional materials to 456 the state academic standards adopted pursuant to s. 1003.41. 457 c.âUse of small learning communities; problem-solving, 458 inquiry-driven research and analytical approaches for students; 459 strategies and tools based on student needs; competency-based 460 instruction; integrated digital instruction; and project-based 461 instruction. 462 463 Each school that includes any of grades 6, 7, or 8 shall include 464 in its school improvement plan, required under s. 1001.42(18), a 465 description of the specific strategies used by the school to 466 implement each item listed in this subparagraph. 467 11.âProvide training to reading coaches, classroom 468 teachers, and school administrators in effective methods of 469 identifying characteristics of conditions such as dyslexia and 470 other causes of diminished phonological processing skills; 471 incorporating instructional techniques into the general 472 education setting which are proven to improve reading 473 performance for all students; and using predictive and other 474 data to make instructional decisions based on individual student 475 needs. The training must help teachers integrate phonemic 476 awareness; phonics, word study, and spelling; reading fluency; 477 vocabulary, including academic vocabulary; and text 478 comprehension strategies into an explicit, systematic, and 479 sequential approach to reading instruction, including 480 multisensory intervention strategies. Such training for teaching 481 foundational skills must be based on the science of reading and 482 include phonics instruction for decoding and encoding as the 483 primary instructional strategy for word reading. Instructional 484 strategies included in the training may not employ the three 485 cueing system model of reading or visual memory as a basis for 486 teaching word reading. Such instructional strategies may include 487 visual information and strategies which improve background and 488 experiential knowledge, add context, and increase oral language 489 and vocabulary to support comprehension, but may not be used to 490 teach word reading. Each district must provide all elementary 491 grades instructional personnel access to training sufficient to 492 meet the requirements of s. 1012.585(3)(f). 493 12.âProvide at least one autism-specific professional 494 development opportunity annually for instructional personnel and 495 school-based administrators. The professional development must 496 be developed and delivered in coordination with the districtâs 497 assigned Center for Autism and Related Disabilities and must 498 include evidence-based practices for supporting students with 499 autism spectrum disorder across all levels of need, including 500 academic instruction, behavioral supports, communication 501 strategies, and inclusive practices. 502 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.